Washington statutes.
RCW 7.52.140

Estate for life or years to be set off.

When a part of the property only is ordered to be sold, if there be an estate for life or years in an undivided share of the property, the whole of such estate may be set off in any part of the property not ordered sold.

[Code 1881 s 565; 1877 p 119 s 570; 1869 p 136 s 518; RRS s 851.]